Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.400.009

Secondary traumatic stress—Policy and procedure.

(1) The Washington state school directors' association shall develop or revise, and periodically update, a model policy and procedure to prevent and address secondary traumatic stress in the workforce.

(2) The model policy and procedure must include the following elements:

(a) A commitment to support mental health in the workplace;

(b) Promotion of a positive workplace climate with a focus on diversity and inclusion;

(c) Establishment of a district-wide workforce mental health committee with the following functions:

(i) Share secondary traumatic stress, stress management, and other mental health resources and supports available through the office of the superintendent of public instruction, the educational service districts, and the school employees' benefits board created in RCW 41.05.740;

(ii) Share links to a secondary traumatic stress self-assessment tool and any associated resources; and

(iii) Report to the school district board of directors at least once per year with a summary of committee activities;

(d) Regular assessment of district-level and school building-level implementation of the policy and procedures that includes input from the workforce; and

(e) Provision of appropriate resources and training to schools and staff for continuous improvement.

(3) The model policy and procedure developed under this section must be posted publicly on the Washington state school directors' association's website by August 1, 2021. Updates to the model policy and procedure must be posted publicly within a reasonable time of development.

(4) By the beginning of the 2021-22 school year, each school district must adopt, or amend if necessary, policies and procedures that, at a minimum, incorporate all the elements described in subsection (2) of this section. School districts must periodically review their policies and procedures for consistency with updated versions of the model policy and procedure.

[ 2021 c 129 s 3.]

NOTES:

Finding—Intent—2021 c 129: See note following RCW 28A.300.825.